tr: Denge minderi aksesuarları: Taşıma çantası/askısı; İndirilebilir antrenmanlar; Egzersiz rehberi; El pompası; Şişirme iğnesi; Yedek tıpalar; Direnç bantları; Saklama kesesi; Valf tıpası; Antrenman tablosu/DVD'si; Diğer
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pernițe pentru echilibru: Geantă/Curea de transport; Antrenamente descărcabile; Ghid de exerciții; Pompă manuală; Ac pentru umflare; Dopuri de rezervă; Benzi de rezistență; Săculeț de depozitare; Dop pentru supapă; Tabel de antrenament/DVD; Altele
cs: Obsažené příslušenství k balančnímu polštáři: Přenosná taška / popruh; Cvičení ke stažení; Průvodce cvičením; Ruční pumpa; Jehla na nafukování; Náhradní špunty; Odporové gumy; Úložné pouzdro; Zátka ventilku; Plakát se cviky / DVD; Jiné
ja: バランスクッションアクセサリー付き: キャリーバッグ/ストラップ; ワークアウトのダウンロード; エクササイズガイド; ハンドポンプ; 空気入れ針; 交換用プラグ; レジスタンスバンド; 収納ポーチ; バルブプラグ; ワークアウトチャート/DVD; その他
zh-CN: 包括平衡垫配件: 手提袋/背带; 可下载的锻炼课程; 锻炼指南; 手动充气泵; 充气针; 替换塞; 阻力带; 收纳袋; 气门塞; 锻炼图表/DVD; 其他
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le coussin d’équilibre: Sac/sangle de transport; Entraînements téléchargeables; Guide d’exercices; Pompe manuelle; Aiguille de gonflage; Bouchons de rechange; Bandes de résistance; Pochette de rangement; Bouchon de valve; Tableau d’exercices/DVD; Autre
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeina balansavimo pagalvėlių priedai: Nešiojimo krepšys / dirželis; Atsisiunčiamos treniruotės; Pratimų vadovas; Rankinė pompa; Pūtimo adata; Atsarginiai kamščiai; Pasipriešinimo gumos; Laikymo maišelis; Vožtuvo kamštis; Treniruočių schema / DVD; Kita
de: Balance-Kissenzubehör im Lieferumfang enthalten: Tragetasche/-gurt; Herunterladbare Workouts; Trainingsanleitung; Handpumpe; Pumpennadel; Ersatzstöpsel; Widerstandsbänder; Aufbewahrungsbeutel; Ventilverschluss; Trainingsplan/DVD; Sonstige
da: Tilbehør til balancepude medfølger: Bæretaske/rem; Træningsprogrammer til download; Træningsvejledning; Håndpumpe; Pumpenål; Ekstra propper; Træningselastikker; Opbevaringspose; Ventilprop; Træningsskema/dvd; Andet
vi: Phụ kiện đệm cân bằng đi kèm: Túi đựng/dây đeo; Bài tập có thể tải xuống; Sách hướng dẫn tập; Bơm tay; Kim bơm; Nút đậy thay thế; Dây kháng lực; Túi bảo quản; Nút van; Biểu đồ bài tập/DVD; Khác
zh-TW: 包含平衡墊配件: 提袋/背帶; 可下載的健身影片; 運動指南; 手動打氣筒; 充氣針; 替換塞; 彈力帶; 收納袋; 氣門塞; 健身圖表/DVD; 其他
sl-SI: Vključeni so dodatki za ravnotežno blazino: Torba/trak za prenašanje; Prenosljivi treningi; Vodnik za vadbo; Ročna tlačilka; Igla za napihovanje; Nadomestni čepki; Elastike za vadbo; Torbica za shranjevanje; Čepek za ventil; Plakat za vadbo/DVD; Drugo
hu: Kiegyensúlyozott párnakiegészítőket tartalmaz: Hordtáska/pánt; Letölthető edzéstervek; Gyakorlati útmutató; Kézi pumpa; Fújótű; Pótdugók; Ellenállási szalagok; Tárolótasak; Szelepdugó; Edzésterv/DVD; Egyéb
pt-BR: Acessórios para almofada de equilíbrio incluídos: Bolsa de transporte/alça; Treinos para download; Guia de exercícios; Bomba manual; Agulha de inflar; Pinos de reposição; Faixas de resistência; Bolsa de armazenamento; Pino da válvula; Tabela de treinos/DVD; Outro
sv: Balanskuddar som ingår: Bärväska/rem; Nedladdningsbara träningspass; Träningsguide; Handpump; Pumpnål; Reservpluggar; Motståndsband; Förvaringspåse; Ventilplugg; Träningsschema/DVD; Övrigt
el: Περιλαμβάνονται άλλα αξεσουάρ μαξιλαριού ισορροπίας: Τσάντα/ιμάντας μεταφοράς; Ασκήσεις με δυνατότητα λήψης; Οδηγός ασκήσεων; Τρόμπα χειρός; Βελόνα φουσκώματος; Ανταλλακτικά πώματα; Λάστιχα αντίστασης; Θήκη αποθήκευσης; Πώμα βαλβίδας; Διάγραμμα ασκήσεων/DVD; Άλλο
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo k balančnému vankúšu v cene: Taška na prenášanie/popruh; Tréningy na stiahnutie; Sprievodca cvičením; Ručná pumpa; Ihla na nafukovanie; Náhradné zátky; Odporové gumy; Úložné vrecko; Zátka ventilu; Tabuľka s cvikmi/DVD; Iné
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมที่รวมมากับเบาะทรงตัว: กระเป๋า/สายสะพาย; วิดีโอออกกำลังกายแบบดาวน์โหลดได้; คู่มือการออกกำลังกาย; ที่สูบลมมือ; เข็มสูบลม; จุกปิดสำรอง; ยางยืดออกกำลังกาย; กระเป๋าเก็บ; จุกปิดวาล์ว; ตารางออกกำลังกาย/ดีวีดี; อื่นๆ
es: Accesorios de cojín de equilibrio incluidos: Bolsa/correa de transporte; Entrenamientos descargables; Guía de ejercicios; Bomba de mano; Aguja de inflado; Tapones de repuesto; Bandas de resistencia; Funda de almacenamiento; Tapón de válvula; Tabla de ejercicios/DVD; Otro
pt-PT: Acessórios de almofada de equilíbrio incluídos: Saco/alça de transporte; Treinos transferíveis; Guia de exercícios; Bomba manual; Agulha de enchimento; Tampões de substituição; Bandas de resistência; Bolsa de armazenamento; Tampão de válvula; Tabela de treinos/DVD; Outro
it: Accessori inclusi per il cuscino da equilibrio: Borsa/cinghia per il trasporto; Allenamenti scaricabili; Guida agli esercizi; Pompa a mano; Ago per gonfiaggio; Tappi di ricambio; Fasce di resistenza; Custodia; Tappo della valvola; Tabella di allenamento/DVD; Altro
en: Balance cushion accessories included: Carry bag/strap; Downloadable workouts; Exercise guide; Hand pump; Inflation needle; Replacement plugs; Resistance bands; Storage pouch; Valve plug; Workout chart/DVD; Other
pl: Akcesoria do poduszki balansującej w zestawie: Torba/pasek do przenoszenia; Treningi do pobrania; Przewodnik po ćwiczeniach; Pompka ręczna; Igła do pompowania; Zapasowe zatyczki; Taśmy oporowe; Pokrowiec; Zatyczka do wentyla; Plakat/płyta DVD z ćwiczeniami; Inne
nb: Balanseputetilbehør inkludert: Bæreveske/-stropp; Nedlastbare treningsøkter; Treningsguide; Håndpumpe; Pumpenål; Ekstra plugger; Treningsstrikker; Oppbevaringspose; Ventilplugg; Treningsoversikt/DVD; Annet
fi: Mukana tulevat tasapainotyynyn lisävarusteet: Kantokassi/-hihna; Ladattavat harjoitukset; Harjoitteluopas; Käsipumppu; Täyttöneula; Vaihtotulpat; Vastuskuminauhat; Säilytyspussi; Venttiilitulppa; Harjoitusohje/DVD; Muu
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари към балансиращата възглавница: Чанта/каишка за носене; Тренировки за изтегляне; Ръководство за упражнения; Ръчна помпа; Игла за надуване; Резервни тапи; Съпротивителни ластици; Торбичка за съхранение; Тапа за вентил; Таблица с тренировки/DVD; Друго
ko: 포함된 밸런스 쿠션 액세서리: 휴대용 가방/스트랩; 다운로드형 운동 영상; 운동 가이드; 핸드 펌프; 공기 주입용 바늘; 교체용 플러그; 저항 밴드; 수납 파우치; 밸브 플러그; 운동 차트/DVD; 기타
nl: Balance cushion accessoires meegeleverd: Draagtas/band; Downloadbare work-outs; Trainingsgids; Handpomp; Pompnaald; Reservepluggen; Weerstandsbanden; Opbergetui; Ventielplug; Trainingsschema/dvd; Overig
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za jastuk za ravnotežu: Torba / remen za nošenje; Treninzi za preuzimanje; Vodič za vježbanje; Ručna pumpa; Igla za pumpanje; Zamjenski čepovi; Elastične trake za vježbanje; Vrećica za pohranu; Čep za ventil; Prikaz vježbi / DVD; Ostalo
ru: Аксессуары для балансировочной подушки в комплекте: Сумка/ремень для переноски; Загружаемые тренировки; Руководство по упражнениям; Ручной насос; Игла для накачивания; Сменные заглушки; Эспандеры; Чехол для хранения; Заглушка для клапана; Таблица тренировок/DVD; Другое